Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1304
Existing shooting range; effect of
zoning provisions.

Any shooting range that is existing and lawful may continue
to operate as a shooting range notwithstanding, and without regard to, any
law, rule, regulation, ordinance, or resolution related to zoning enacted
thereafter by a city, county, village, or other political subdivision of the
state, if operated in compliance with the shooting range performance standards.

Laws 2009, LB503, § 4.